en: Morel, Morchella, Morels
de: Morcheln, Morchella
es: Morchella, Morillas
fr: Morilles, Morille, Morchellas
hr: Smrčak
it: Morchella
nl: Morielje, Morille, Morchella
pl: Smardze

en: Chanterelles, Golden chanterelles, Girolles, Cantharellus cibarius, chanterelles, girolle mushrooms
es: Rebozuelos, Chantarelas, Cantharellus cibarius
fr: Girolles, Girolle, Jaunotte, Jauniré, Cantharellus cibarius, Chanterelle ciboire, chevrette, roussotte, gallinace, Chanterelles crues, Girolles crues, Champignons chanterelles, Champignons girolles, Chanterelles
hr: Lisičarke
la: Cantharellus cibarius
nl: Cantharellen, Hanenkammen

en: Horn of plenty mushrooms, Horn of plenty
es: Setas trompeta de los muertos, Trompetas de los muertos, Trompetas de la muerte
fr: Trompettes des morts, Craterelles en forme de corne d'abondance, Cornes d'abondance, Trompettes de la mort
hr: Rog obilja gljiva
la: Craterellus cornucopioides
nl: Doodstrompetten, Hoorn van overvloeds

en: Hygrophorus latitabundus
es: Setas babosa negra, Setas llanega, Setas llanega negra, Hygrophorus latitabundus
fr: Hygrophorus latitabundus
hr: Hygrophorus latitabundus
la: Hygrophorus latitabundus, Hygrophorus limacinus

en: Jew's ear mushrooms, Wood ear mushrooms, Jelly ear mushrooms
es: Setas orejas de Judas, Orejas de Judas
fr: Oreilles de Judas, Oreilles du diable
hr: Židovske gljive za uho
la: Auricularia auricula-judae
nl: Judasoren
pl: Grzyby mun

en: King trumpet mushrooms, French horn mushrooms, King oyster mushrooms, King brown mushrooms, Boletus of the steppes, Trumpet royale, Pleurotus eryngii
es: Setas de cardo, Pleurotus eryngii
fr: Pleurotes du panicaut, Encore argouane, Bérigoule, Girboulot, Pleurotus eryngii
hr: Kraljevske gljive trube
la: Pleurotus eryngii
nl: Kruisdisteloesterzwammen

en: Caesar's mushrooms, royal agarics
fr: Oronges vraies, Champignons oronges vraies

en: Nameko mushrooms, Nameko, Pholiota nameko
es: Setas nameko, Nameko, Pholiota nameko
fr: Champignons nameko, Nameko, Pholiota nameko
hr: Nameko gljive
ja: ナメコ
la: Pholiota nameko

en: Oyster mushrooms, Pleurotus ostreatus
es: Setas de ostra, Setas ostra, Champiñones ostra, Gírgolas, Pleurotus ostreatus
fr: Pleurotes, Champignons pleurotes, Pleurotes en huître, Pleurotus ostreatus
hr: Bukovače
ja: ヒラタケ
la: Pleurotus ostreatus
nl: Oesterzwammen

en: Chopped oyster mushrooms
es: Setas de ostra laminadas, Setas de ostra troceadas
fr: Pleurotes en huître émincés
hr: Nasjeckane bukovače
nl: Gesneden oesterzwammen

en: Whole oyster mushrooms
es: Setas de ostra enteras
fr: Pleurotes entiers, Pleurotes en huître entiers
hr: Cijele bukovače
nl: Hele oesterzwammen

en: Paddy straw mushrooms, Straw mushrooms, Volvariella volvacea
es: Champiñones de Straw, Setas de arroz, Paja seta, Setas volvarea, Seta volvarea, Volvariella volvacea
fr: Volvaire volvacée, Volvaire cultivée, Volvaire asiatique, Volvariella volvacea
hr: Neoluštene gljive
la: Volvariella volvacea
nl: Tropische beurszwammen, Rijst-stro-paddestoelen

en: Porcini mushrooms, Porcini, Penny bun, Porcino, Boletus edulis
de: Steinpilze
es: Boletos comestibles, Boletus comestible, Setas de calabaza, Boletus edulis
fr: Cèpes de Bordeaux, Boletus edulis
hr: Vrganji
ja: ポルチーニ
la: Boletus edulis
nl: Gewoon eekhoorntjesbrood
pl: Borowiki

en: Cep mushrooms, Boletus mushrooms
fr: Champignons cèpes, Cèpes

en: Red pine mushrooms, Saffron milk caps, Lactarius deliciosus
es: Níscalos, Lactarius deliciosus
fr: Lactaires délicieux, Rudes, Roussillous, Lactarius deliciosus
hr: Gljive crvene borovice
la: Lactarius deliciosus
nl: Oranjegroenen melkzwammen

en: Scotch bonnet mushrooms, Scotch bonnets, Fairy ring mushrooms
es: Setas senderilla, Senderuelas, Senderillas, Setas de carrerilla
fr: Marasmes des Oréades, Faux mousseron, Cariolette
hr: Scotch bonnet gljive
la: Marasmius oreades
nl: Weidekringzwammen

en: Shiitake mushrooms, Shiitake, Lentinula edodes
bg: Гъби Шийтаке
es: Setas shiitake, Shiitake, Setas shitake, Shitake, Lentinula edodes
fr: Champignons shiitake, Shiitake, Lentins du chêne, Lentinula edodes
hr: Shiitake gljive
ja: 椎茸, しいたけ
la: Lentinula edodes
nl: Shiitakes
pl: Grzyby shiitake

en: Cooked shiitake mushrooms
fr: Lentins cuits, Shiitaké cuits

en: Mixed mushrooms
es: Mezclas de setas, Surtidos de setas, Surtido de setas
fr: Mélanges de champignons, Mélange de champignons
hr: Miješane gljive
nl: Paddestoelenmelanges

en: Truffles
bg: Трюфели
de: Trüffel, Trüffeln
es: Trufas
fr: Truffes
hr: Tartufi
ja: トリュフ
la: Tuber
nl: Truffels